Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF5111.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 126C.44, is amended to read: 126C.44 SAFE SCHOOLS REVENUE. Subdivision 1. Safe schools revenue for school districts. A school district's safe schools revenue equals its safe schools levy. Subd. 2. School district safe schools levy. A school district's safe schools levy equals $36 times the district's adjusted pupil units for the school year. Subd. 3. new text begin Cooperative units new text end safe schools revenue deleted text begin for intermediate school districtsdeleted text end . new text begin (a) new text end A school district that is a member of an intermediate school district may include in its levy authority under this section the costs associated with safe schools activities authorized under this section for intermediate school district programs. This authority must not exceed the product of $15 and the adjusted pupil units of the member districts. This authority is in addition to any other authority authorized under this section. Revenue raised under this subdivision must be transferred to the intermediate school district. new text begin (b) For a school district that is a member of a cooperative unit other than an intermediate school district, the school district's cooperative unit safe schools aid equals $36 times the member district's pupil units for the year. new text end new text begin (c) A school district's cooperative unit safe schools aid must be paid to the cooperative unit in the form and manner specified by the commissioner. new text end new text begin (d) For purposes of this section, a school district must designate only one cooperative unit as the recipient of its cooperative unit state aid in the form and manner specified by the commissioner. new text end new text begin (e) For purposes of this section, cooperative unit has the meaning given in section 123A.24, subdivision 2. new text end new text begin Subd. 3a. new text end new text begin Safe schools aid for charter schools. new text end new text begin For fiscal year 2027 and later, safe schools aid for a charter school equals $36 times the adjusted pupil units for the school year. new text end new text begin Subd. 3b. new text end new text begin Safe schools aid for nonpublic schools. new text end new text begin (a) For fiscal year 2027 and later, safe schools aid for a nonpublic school equals $36 times the school's enrollment for the school year. new text end new text begin (b) A nonpublic school must report enrollment and other necessary information to the commissioner in the form and manner specified by the commissioner. The commissioner must establish a payment schedule for safe schools aid for nonpublic schools. new text end new text begin (c) For purposes of this section, nonpublic school has the meaning given in section 123B.41, subdivision 9. new text end new text begin Subd. 3c. new text end new text begin Safe schools aid for American Indian Tribal contract schools. new text end new text begin Safe schools aid for an American Indian Tribal contract school eligible for aid under section 124D.83 equals $36 times the pupil units for the school year calculated under section 124D.83, subdivision 2. new text end Subd. 4. Use of safe schools revenue. (a) Safe schools revenue must be reserved and used for directly funding the following purposes or for reimbursing the cities and counties who contract with the deleted text begin districtdeleted text end new text begin schoolnew text end for the following purposes: (1) to pay the costs incurred for the salaries, benefits, and transportation costs of peace officers and sheriffs for liaison in services in the deleted text begin district'sdeleted text end schools; (2) to pay the costs for a drug abuse prevention program as defined in section 609.101, subdivision 3, paragraph (e), in the elementary schools; (3) to pay the costs for a gang resistance education training curriculum in the deleted text begin district'sdeleted text end schools; (4) to pay the costs for security in the deleted text begin district'sdeleted text end schools and on school property; (5) to pay the costs for other crime prevention, drug abuse, student and staff safety, voluntary opt-in suicide prevention tools, and violence prevention measures taken by the school deleted text begin districtdeleted text end ; (6) to pay costs for licensed school counselors, licensed school nurses, licensed school social workers, licensed school psychologists, and licensed alcohol and substance use disorder counselors to help provide early responses to problems; (7) to pay for facility security enhancements including laminated glass, public announcement systems, emergency communications devices, and equipment and facility modifications related to violence prevention and facility security; (8) to pay for costs associated with improving the school climate; (9) to pay costs for colocating and collaborating with mental health professionals who are not deleted text begin districtdeleted text end new text begin schoolnew text end employees or contractorsnew text begin or for school-linked mental health services delivered by telehealthnew text end ; or (10) to pay for the costs of cybersecurity measures, including updating computer hardware and software, other systems upgrades, and cybersecurity insurance costs. (b) For expenditures under paragraph (a), clause (1), the new text begin school new text end district must initially attempt to contract for services to be provided by peace officers or sheriffs with the police department of each city or the sheriff's department of the county within the district containing the school receiving the services. If a local police department or a county sheriff's department does not wish to provide the necessary services, the district may contract for these services with any other police or sheriff's department located entirely or partially within the school district's boundaries. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective for revenue for fiscal year 2027 and later. new text end Sec. 2. new text begin APPROPRIATION; SAFE SCHOOLS AID.new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Department of Education. new text end new text begin The sum indicated in this section is appropriated from the general fund to the Department of Education in the fiscal year designated. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Safe schools aid. new text end new text begin For safe schools aid under Minnesota Statutes, section 126C.44: new text end new text begin $ new text end new text begin ....... new text end new text begin ..... new text end new text begin 2027 new text end